Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and section 2 of this 2023 Act:
(1)(a) “Green electrolytic hydrogen” means hydrogen produced through electrolysis us-
ing:
(A) A renewable energy source as defined in ORS 469A.005;
(B) Nonemitting electricity that is not derived from a fossil fuel; or
(C) Electricity that has a carbon intensity  that is equal to or less than the average car-
bon intensity of the electricity served in this state in the calendar year in which construction
or expansion of the facility that produces the green electrolytic hydrogen began.
(b) “Green electrolytic hydrogen”  does not include hydrogen manufactured using any
conversion technology or steam  reforming that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel
feedstock.
(2) “Nonemitting electricity” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469A.400.
(3) “Renewable hydrogen” means hydrogen produced using:
(a) A renewable energy source as defined in ORS 469A.005;
(b) Nonemitting electricity that is not derived from a fossil fuel; or
(c) Electricity that has a carbon  intensity that is equal to or less than the average car-
bon intensity of the electricity served in this state in the calendar year in which construction
or expansion of the facility that produces the renewable hydrogen began.
SECTION 2.
To support the state’s transition to clean energy by accelerating  the pro-
duction, distribution and end use of renewable hydrogen and  green electrolytic hydrogen fu-
els, the State Department of Energy shall:
(1) Where appropriate, seek and apply for federal funds for which the state  is eligible,
and support other applications for federal funds, that may be used to support  the develop-
ment and deployment of  renewable hydrogen and green electrolytic hydrogen in this state;
and
(2) Provide education and increase awareness regarding renewable hydrogen and green
electrolytic hydrogen for federally recognized Indian  tribes, local governments, other state
agencies, federal agencies, private entities, this state’s four-year  public institutions of higher
education, labor unions, environmental justice communities and other relevant entities.
Enrolled House Bill 2530 (HB 2530-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 2, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2530 (HB 2530-A) Page 2